Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.260

General obligation bonds—Excess property tax levies.

A mosquito control district shall have the power to issue general obligation bonds and to pledge the full faith and credit of the district to the payment thereof, for authorized capital purposes of the mosquito control district, and to provide for the retirement thereof by excess property tax levies whenever a proposition authorizing both the issuance of such bonds and the imposition of such excess levies has been approved by the voters of the district, at an election held pursuant to RCW 39.36.050, by three-fifths of the persons voting on said proposition at said election at which such election the total number of persons voting on such bond proposition shall constitute not less than forty percent of the total number of votes cast within the area of said mosquito control district at the last preceding county or state general election. Mosquito control districts may become indebted for capital purposes up to an amount equal to one and one-fourth percent of the value of the taxable property in the district, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015.

Such bonds shall never be issued to run for a longer period than ten years from the date of issue and shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 5; 1983 c 167 s 18; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 4; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 65; 1957 c 153 s 26.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.